Washington statutes.
RCW 9.100.080

Copies of chapter—Transmission.

Copies of this chapter shall, upon its approval, be transmitted by the secretary of state to the governor of each state, to the attorney general and the secretary of state of the United States, and the council of state governments.

[ 1967 c 34 s 8.]